Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1401
Act, how cited.

Sections 86-1401 to 86-1406 shall be known and may be cited as the Precision Agriculture Infrastructure Grant Act.

Laws 2022, LB1144, § 12.
July 21, 2022